California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(A) The child meets the medical necessity criteria for Medi-Cal specialty mental health services, as provided for in Section 1830.205 or 1830.210 of Title 9 of the California Code of Regulations.

(B) The child is seriously emotionally disturbed, as described in subdivision (a) of Section 5600.3.

(3) (A) Nothing in subdivisions (a) to (g), inclusive, or this subdivision shall prevent an emergency placement of a child or youth into a certified short-term residential therapeutic program prior to the determination by the interagency placement committee, but only if a licensed mental health professional, as
 defined in subdivision (j) of Section 4096, has made a written determination within 72 hours of the child’s or youth’s placement, that the child or youth requires the level of services and supervision provided by the short-term residential therapeutic program in order to meet their behavioral or therapeutic needs. If the short-term residential therapeutic program serves children placed by county child welfare agencies and children placed by probation departments, the interagency placement committee shall also ensure the requirements of subdivision (c) of Section 16514 have been met with respect to commonality of need.

(i) The interagency placement committee, as appropriate, shall, within 30 days of placement, make the determinations, with recommendations from the child and family team, required by this subdivision.

(ii) If it determines the placement is appropriate, the
 interagency placement committee, with recommendations from the child and family team, shall transmit the approval, in writing, to the county placing agency and the short-term residential therapeutic program.

(iii) If it determines the placement is not appropriate, the interagency placement committee shall respond pursuant to subparagraph (B).

(B) (i) If the interagency placement committee determines at any time that the placement is not appropriate, it shall, with recommendations from the child and family team, transmit the disapproval, in writing, to the county placing agency and the short-term residential therapeutic program and shall include a recommendation as to the child’s appropriate level of care and placement to meet the child’s service needs. The necessary interagency placement committee representative or representatives shall participate in any
 child and family team meetings to refer the child or youth to an appropriate placement, as specified in this section.

(ii) The child may remain in the placement for the amount of time necessary to identify and transition the child to an alternative, suitable placement. On and after October 1, 2021, federal AFDC-FC shall not be used to fund the placement for more than 30 days from the date that the qualified individual or interagency placement committee determined that the placement is no longer recommended or the court disapproved the placement.

(iii) Notwithstanding clause (ii), if the interagency placement committee determined the placement was not appropriate due to a health and safety concern, immediate arrangements for the child to transition to an appropriate placement shall occur.

(i) Commencing January 1,
 2017, for AFDC-FC funded children or youth, only those children or youth who are approved for placement, as set forth in this section, may be accepted by a short-term residential therapeutic program.

(j) The department shall, through regulation, establish consequences for the failure of a short-term residential therapeutic program to obtain written approval for placement of an AFDC-FC funded child or youth pursuant to this section.

(k) The department shall not establish a rate for a short-term residential therapeutic program unless the provider submits a recommendation from the host county or the primary placing county that the program is needed and that the provider is willing and capable of operating the program at the level sought. For purposes of this subdivision, “host county,” and “primary placing county,” mean the same as defined in the department’s AFDC-FC ratesetting
 regulations.

(l) Any short-term residential therapeutic program shall be reclassified and paid at the appropriate program rate for which it is qualified if any of the following occur:

(1) (A) It fails to maintain the level of care and services necessary to meet the needs of the children and youth in care, as required by subdivision (a). The determination shall be made consistent with the department’s AFDC-FC ratesetting regulations developed pursuant to Section 11462.

(B) In the event of a determination under this paragraph, the short-term residential therapeutic program may appeal the finding or submit a corrective action plan. The appeal process specified in Section 11466.6 shall be available to a short-term residential therapeutic program. During any appeal, the short-term residential therapeutic program shall maintain the appropriate level of care.

(2) It fails to maintain a mental
 health treatment program as required by subdivision (f).

(3) It fails to timely obtain or maintain accreditation as required by state law or fails to provide proof of that accreditation to the department upon request.

(m) In addition to any other review required by law, the child and family team as defined in paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 16501 may periodically review the placement of the child or youth. If the child and family team make a recommendation that the child or youth no longer needs, or is not benefiting from, placement in a short-term residential therapeutic program, the team shall transmit the disapproval, in writing, to the county placing agency to consider a more appropriate placement.

(n) The department shall develop a process to address placements when, subsequent to the child’s or
 youth’s placement, a determination is made by the interagency placement team and shall consider the recommendations of the child and family team, either that the child or youth is not in need of the care and services provided by the certified program. The process shall include, but not be limited to:

(1) Notice of the determination in writing to both the county placing agency and the short-term residential therapeutic program or foster family agency that provides intensive and therapeutic treatment.

(2) Notice of the county’s plan, and a timeframe, for removal of the child or youth in writing to the short-term residential therapeutic program that provides intensive and therapeutic treatment.

(3) Referral to an appropriate placement.

(4) Actions to be
 taken if a child or youth is not timely removed from the short-term residential therapeutic program that provides intensive and therapeutic treatment or placed in an appropriate placement.

(o) (1) Nothing in this section shall prohibit a short-term residential therapeutic program from accepting private admissions of children or youth.

(2) When a referral is not from a public agency and public funding is not involved, there is no requirement for public agency review or determination of need.

(3) Children and youth subject to paragraphs (1) and (2) shall have been determined to be seriously emotionally disturbed, as described in subdivision (a) of Section 5600.3, and subject to Section 1502.4 of the Health and Safety Code, by a licensed mental health professional, as defined in subdivision (j) of
 Section 4096.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 46, Sec. 29.   (AB 161)   Effective July 2, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

11462.011.

(a) The State Department of Health Care Services shall, in consultation with the Department of Managed Health Care, the State Department of Social Services, the County Behavioral Health Directors Association of California, the County Welfare Directors Association of California, the Chief Probation Officers of California, provider representatives, and other relevant stakeholders, establish program standards and procedures for oversight, enforcement, and issuance of children’s crisis residential mental health program approvals, including provisional approvals that are effective for a period of less than one year. The State Department of Health Care Services shall also establish due process protections related to the children’s crisis
 residential mental health program approval process.

(b) The State Department of Health Care Services shall, in collaboration with the department, the County Behavioral Health Directors Association of California, provider representatives, and other relevant stakeholders, provide guidance to counties for the provision of children’s crisis residential services, including funding for children who are Medi-Cal beneficiaries and who are admitted to a children’s crisis residential program. This subdivision shall only be implemented to the extent that any necessary federal approvals are obtained and federal financial participation is available and is not otherwise jeopardized.

(c) (1) The children’s crisis residential program shall be used only as a diversion to
 admittance to a psychiatric hospital.

(2) (A) The length of the initial authorization for admission to a children’s crisis residential program shall be limited to 10 consecutive days.

(B) If a determination is made by a health care professional that a children’s crisis residential program is medically necessary and is the appropriate continued level of care, either of the following shall occur:

(i) In the case of a Medi-Cal beneficiary, the children’s crisis residential program shall notify the county mental health plan authorizing those services before extending the length of stay beyond 10 consecutive days.

(ii) In the case of
 non-Medi-Cal beneficiaries, reauthorizations for admission shall be obtained using the process established by the entity providing coverage.

(C) With the exception of clause (ii) of subparagraph (B), this paragraph shall be implemented only to the extent that any necessary federal approvals are obtained and the State Department of Health Care Services determines, in its sole discretion, that federal financial participation is not jeopardized.

(3) A children’s crisis residential program may accept for admission any child who meets all of the following requirements:

(A) The child is referred by a parent or guardian, physician, or licensed mental health professional, or by the representative of a public or private entity,
 including, but not limited to, the county probation agency or child welfare services agency with responsibility for the placement of a child in foster care, that has the right to make these decisions on behalf of a child who is in mental health crisis.

(B) The child is under 19, 20, or 21 years of age, depending on a program’s licensing requirements.

(C) The child has a serious behavioral health disorder.

(D) The child requires a 24-hours-a-day, seven-days-a-week, staff-secured, unlocked treatment setting.

(d) A children’s crisis residential mental health program approval issued by the State Department of Health Care Services, or a county mental health plan
 to which the department has delegated approval authority, shall be a condition of continued licensure for a short-term residential therapeutic program operating as a children’s crisis residential program.

(e) The State Department of Health Care Services, or a county mental health plan to which the department has delegated approval authority, may enforce the children’s crisis residential mental health program approval standards by taking any of the following actions against a noncompliant children’s crisis residential program:

(1) Suspend or revoke a children’s crisis residential mental health program approval.

(2) Impose monetary penalties.

(3) Place a
 children’s crisis residential mental health program on probation.

(4) Require a children’s crisis residential mental health program to prepare and comply with a corrective action plan.

(f) The State Department of Health Care Services, or a county mental health plan to which the department has delegated approval authority, shall provide a children’s crisis residential mental health program with due process protections when taking any of the actions described in subdivision (e).

(g) Contingent upon an appropriation in the annual Budget Act for these purposes, the department shall begin implementation of this section no later than July 1, 2018, and shall commence the operation of the approval process for children’s crisis
 residential mental health program approvals no later than January 1, 2019.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 910, Sec. 36.   (AB 1930)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

11462.02.

(a) Any existing county-operated foster family agency or group home, including the group home operated by the County of San Mateo, shall, commencing January 1, 2017, be classified as, and shall meet all of the requirements of, a foster family agency or a short-term residential therapeutic program, as defined respectively in subdivisions (g) and (ad) of Section 11400, to be eligible to receive AFDC-FC funds.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, the State Department of Social Services may license a county as a foster family agency or as a short-term residential therapeutic program.

(c) If a county exercises its option to operate a foster family agency or a
 short-term residential therapeutic program, the county shall submit an application and shall comply with the requirements of Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 1500) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code related to foster family agency programs or a short-term residential therapeutic program, as applicable.

(d) A county that requests, and is granted, a license for a foster family agency or short-term residential therapeutic program shall apply for an AFDC-FC rate pursuant to Section 11462 or 11463, as applicable.

(e) As a condition for eligibility for an AFDC-FC rate for a short-term residential therapeutic program or a foster family agency, the county shall comply with all applicable law concerning a short-term residential therapeutic program or foster family agency, including, but not limited to, the following provisions related to licensing, rate, audit, due process,
 enforcement, and overpayment collection:

(1) Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 1500) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code.

(2) Article 10 (commencing with Section 360) of Chapter 2 of Part 1 of Division 2 of this code.

(3) Article 18 (commencing with Section 725) of Chapter 2 of Part 1 of Division 2 of this code.

(4) Article 22 (commencing with Section 825) of Chapter 2 of Part 1 of Division 2 of this code.

(5) Article 5 (commencing with Section 11400) of Chapter 2 of Part 3 of Division 9 of this code.

(6) Article 6 (commencing with Section 11450) of Chapter 2 of Part 3 of Division 9 of this code.

(f) The state is not obligated under Section 36 of Article XIII of the California Constitution to provide any annual funding to a county to comply with this section; with any regulation, executive order, or administrative order implementing this section; or with any federal statute or regulation related to this section, because the county’s operation of a licensed short-term residential therapeutic program or foster family agency is optional for the county and is not required by this section.

(g) Counties licensed to operate a foster family agency or short-term residential therapeutic program shall, as a condition to receiving payment, ensure that its conflict-of-interest mitigation plan, submitted to the department pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 1506.1 and subdivision (d) of Section 1562.01 of the Health and Safety Code, addresses, but is not limited to, the following:

(1) A decision to place children and youth in a county-operated facility when alternative appropriate placement options exist.

(2) The reporting by county staff to the department or other agencies of observed noncompliant conditions or health and safety concerns in county-operated foster family agencies or short-term residential therapeutic programs.

(3) The cross-reporting of reports received from mandatory child abuse and neglect reporters involving county-operated foster family agencies and short-term residential therapeutic programs.

(4) Disclosures of fatalities and near fatalities of children placed in county-operated foster family agencies and short-term residential therapeutic programs.

(h) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2017.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 773, Sec. 78) by Stats. 2016, Ch. 612, Sec. 93.   (AB 1997)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

11462.022.

(a) Upon meeting the licensure requirements pursuant to Section 1530.8 of the Health and Safety Code, a county child welfare agency operating a temporary shelter care facility, as defined in Section 1530.8 of the Health and Safety Code, shall comply with this section.

(b) Prior to detaining the child in the temporary shelter care facility, the child welfare agency shall make reasonable efforts, consistent with current law, to place the child with a relative, tribal member, nonrelative extended family member,
 approved resource family, or in the case of an Indian child, an extended family member as described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 224.1 or a tribally approved home as described in subdivision (r) of Section 224.1 and in Section 10553.12. When the child welfare agency has reason to believe that the child is or may be an Indian child, the agency shall make active efforts to comply with the federal Indian Child Welfare Act placement preferences, as required by Section 361.31.

(c) A child may be detained or placed in a temporary shelter care facility only for the duration necessary to enable the county placing agency to perform the required assessments and to appropriately place the child.

(d) Upon admission, the temporary shelter care facility shall provide each child with health, mental health, and developmental screenings, as applicable. Commencing when a child is admitted into a temporary shelter care facility, and continuing until the child’s discharge from the facility, the county welfare agency shall continuously strive to identify and place the child in an appropriate licensed or approved home or facility.

(e) The temporary shelter care facility shall ensure that the following services, at a minimum, are identified in the facility’s plan of operation and are available to children detained at the facility:

(1) Medical, developmental, behavioral, and mental health assessments based on the
 information obtained through the screenings required pursuant to subdivision (d).

(2) Based on the screening, assessments, and other information obtained about the child, identification of the appropriate placement
 resources that meet the child’s needs.

(3) Trauma-informed services and interventions.

(4) Crisis intervention services.

(5) Care and supervision provided by trauma-informed trained and qualified staff.

(6) Referrals to and coordination with service providers who can meet the medical, developmental, behavioral, or mental health needs of the child identified upon admission.

(7) Educational services to ensure the child’s educational progress, including efforts to maintain the child in their
 school of origin if practical.

(8) Visitation services, including the ability to provide court-ordered, supervised visitation.

(9) Structured indoor and outdoor activities, including recreational and social programs.

(10) Transportation and other forms of support to ensure, to the extent possible, the child’s ability to attend and participate in important milestone events.

(11) Mentorship and peer support-type programs.

(f) (1) In no case shall the detention or placement in a temporary shelter care facility exceed 10 calendar days. For any stay that exceeds 10
 calendar days, the child welfare agency shall submit a written report to the department, within 24 hours of an overstay, that shall include a description of the reasons and circumstances for the child’s overstay, and shall be signed by the county child welfare agency director or their designee. The department may choose not to issue a citation to the county for a violation of the 10-day placement limit when, based on the information contained in the report, the overstay is reasonable and the county is complying with subdivision (d).

(2) The child welfare agency may permit any child or youth to access assessment and other services described in subdivision (d) or (e) while in an out-of-home placement.

(3) To ensure the protection of children placed in temporary shelter care
 facilities, the child welfare agency shall separate children placed in temporary shelter care facilities pursuant to subdivision (b) from children returning to the shelter due to a failed placement, when possible, when circumstances warrant that separation. Temporary shelters shall staff as necessary to adequately supervise children to ensure an appropriate environment for all children present.

(g) At the request of the county, the department shall provide technical assistance necessary for the implementation of this section.

(h) The department, in consultation with the counties, shall provide a report to the Legislature no later than January 1, 2021, that shall include the number of children and youth served by temporary shelter care facilities, characteristics of children
 detained in these facilities, and whether there is a continued need for the licensing and operation of temporary shelter care facilities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 656, Sec. 30.   (AB 81)   Effective September 27, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

11462.04.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, commencing January 1, 2017, no new group home rate or change to an existing rate shall be established pursuant to the Rate Classification Level (RCL) system.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the department may grant an exception as appropriate, on a case-by-case basis, when a written request and supporting documentation are provided by a county placing agency, including a county welfare or probation director, that absent the granting of that exception, there is a material risk to the welfare of children due to an inadequate supply of appropriate alternative placement options to meet the needs of children.

(c) For group homes being paid under the RCL system, and
 those granted an exception pursuant to paragraph (b), group home rates shall terminate on December 31, 2016, unless granted an extension under the exception process in subdivision (d) or (e).

(d) A group home may request an exception to extend its rate as follows:

(1) The department may grant an extension for up to two years, through December 31, 2018, except as provided in paragraph (2), on a case-by-case basis, when a written request and supporting documentation are provided by a county placing agency, including a county welfare or probation director, that absent the granting of that exception, there is a material risk to the welfare of children due to an inadequate supply of appropriate alternative placement options to meet the needs of children. The exception may include time to meet the program accreditation requirement or the mental health certification requirement.

(A) The department may grant an additional extension to a group home beyond December 31, 2018, upon a county child welfare agency submitting a written request on behalf of a provider and providing documentation in a format to be determined by the department pursuant to subparagraph (B). If granted, the extension requests shall be provided in increments up to six months and may be renewed by the department if the documentation is provided. Extensions granted pursuant to this subparagraph shall not exceed a total of 12 months.

(B) In order to be eligible to maintain placement of placed foster youth in a group home receiving an extension pursuant to subparagraph (A), the county child welfare agency, in partnership with the county mental health plan, shall submit a plan to the department by August 15, 2018. This plan shall do all of the following:

(i) Describe the agency’s plan to transition all foster youth under the jurisdiction of the county residing in group homes into a home-based placement, or, if determined by the interagency placement committee, to a licensed short-term residential therapeutic program (STRTP) within the extension period.

(ii) Address the need, availability, and capacity of STRTPs and other therapeutic placement options for the youth under the jurisdiction of the county and document prior and ongoing efforts taken to solicit or develop needed STRTP capacity.

(iii) Develop and document child specific transition plans that include a description of all of the following:

(I) Intensive family finding and engagement for every child lacking an identified home-based caregiver,
 including those youth identified for STRTP transition.

(II) Child and family team-driven case plans that identify and respond to barriers to home-based placement.

(III) Documentation of the trauma-informed and permanency-competent specialty mental health services to be provided, including wraparound, collateral, intensive care coordination and intensive home-based services, and therapeutic behavioral services.

(iv) Document efforts to expand or establish intensive services foster care, therapeutic foster care programs, and other home-based services that provide timely access to trauma-informed care, in conjunction with the county behavioral health department.

(v) Detail any barriers to achieving the goals in clauses (i) to (iv), inclusive, that have led
 the county to support the extension.

(vi) Identify any additional solutions to the barriers that are not addressed in the efforts identified in clauses (i) to (iv), inclusive, which may include needed action from partner agencies such as county boards of supervisors, county behavioral health directors, the department, the State Department of Health Care Services, STRTPs, foster family agencies, or other local agencies, including, but not limited to, regional centers and special education agencies, that would aid the county child welfare agency in delivering appropriate services to foster youth.

(C) The department shall require a provider on whose behalf an extension is being sought pursuant to subparagraph (A) to document the provider’s efforts to convert to an STRTP, foster family agency, or other service provider.

(2) Pursuant to Section 11462.041, after the expiration of the extension afforded in paragraph (1), the department may grant an additional extension to a group home beyond December 31, 2018, upon a provider submitting a written request and the county probation department providing documentation stating that absent the granting of that extension, there is a significant risk to the safety of the youth or the public, due to an inadequate supply of short-term residential therapeutic programs or resource families necessary to meet the needs of probation youth. The extension granted to any provider through this section may be reviewed annually by the department if concerns arise regarding that provider’s facility. Pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 11462.041, the final report submitted to the Legislature shall address whether or not the extensions are still necessary.

(3) The exception shall allow the provider to continue to receive
 the rate under the prior ratesetting system.

(4) A provider granted an extension pursuant to this section shall continue to operate and be governed by the applicable laws and regulations that were operative on December 31, 2016.

(5) If the exception request granted pursuant to this subdivision is not made by the host county, the placing county shall notify and provide a copy to the host county.

(e) (1) It is the intent of the Legislature to ensure that foster youth with more intensive needs receive timely access to services and supports that will reduce the use of, and the length of stay in, congregate care settings, while acknowledging that the ultimate goal for these youth is placement in a home-based setting that will lead to permanency. It is also the intent of the Legislature to acknowledge
 that continued development of home-based intensive services capacity is necessary to reduce the use of congregate care, and that state and county agencies and foster care providers must work together during the extension period described in this section to address the barriers to building the needed capacity to serve foster youth in a variety of high-quality settings.

(2) The department may grant an extension to a group home beyond December 31, 2019, and until December 31, 2020, upon a county child welfare agency submitting a written request on behalf of a provider that includes an update to any previously submitted documentation described in subdivision (d). In order to be eligible to maintain placement of placed foster youth in a group home receiving an extension pursuant to this subdivision, the county child welfare agency and the county mental health plan shall submit a collaborative plan to the department and the State Department of Health
 Care Services by December 15, 2019. The plan shall do all of the following:

(A) Update the child-specific transition plans previously submitted pursuant to clause (iii) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (d), or provide new child-specific transition plans, if not previously submitted, for any foster youth who remains in a group home that is currently transitioning to STRTP licensure and for any foster child who remains in a group home that is not transitioning to STRTP licensure, as evidenced by the department not having received an STRTP program statement or having been denied licensure as an STRTP. The updated or new child-specific transition plans shall include the following:

(i) Verification that family finding activities were previously attempted on behalf of the child and a description of family finding activities currently underway, or other activities to
 connect the child to caring adults outside of the congregate care setting who can provide emotional support to the child.

(ii) A summary of child and family team meetings and case plan efforts to address the child’s strengths and needs, as informed by the Child and Adolescent Needs and Strengths (CANS) assessment, and any planned activities to support the child’s transition to another appropriate placement.

(iii) A summary of the specialty mental health services planned or provided to the child to support the case plan goals, as informed by the CANS assessment and the child and family team.

(B) Based on an analysis by the department, in consultation with the county child welfare agencies and behavioral health agencies, update and validate the needed congregate care capacity and capacity of intensive, home-based
 services as an alternative to congregate care and existing or planned contracts with congregate care or family-based providers.

(C) Identify any existing or planned contracts or efforts to directly provide or contract for intensive family finding and child-specific recruitment for children in congregate care or other family-based settings.

(D) Identify any existing or planned specialty mental health services targeted to address the mental health service needs of a foster child transitioning from congregate care to permanency or other family-based care setting and any gaps that remain. For children residing in group homes who require the level of care provided by an STRTP, as determined by an interagency placement committee, or who are placed into an STRTP without a mental health contract, provide a description of the specialty mental health services arranged for by the county
 mental health plan to address the mental health service needs of children placed into the facilities.

(3) A county that did not submit a request and plan for extension pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (d), may submit a request for an extension pursuant to this subdivision, but the county shall also submit the information required pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (d).

(4) The department, the State Department of Health Care Services, the County Welfare Directors Association of California, the County Behavioral Health Directors Association of California, the Chief Probation Officers of California, the California Alliance of Child and Family Services, and other stakeholders, shall meet to develop a collaborative plan to address barriers to building high-quality services in residential treatment programs and in family-based settings, including, but
 not limited to, all of the following:

(A) Developing technical assistance to support youth who have more intensive service needs to prevent placement disruptions and out-of-state placements and support transitions to relative-based care or other family-based care.

(B) Identifying ways to increase intensive family-based home capacity to support foster youth transitioning from congregate care and to prevent congregate care placement.

(C) Identifying systemic improvements and technical assistance options to assist providers in navigating processes, such as STRTP licensure, mental health plan approval, Medi-Cal billing, Medi-Cal certification, implementing trauma-informed programming and services, and transitioning to other facility types and services.

(D) Evaluating the timing of STRTP licensure, accreditation, mental health plan approval, and Medi-Cal certification processes to facilitate the conversion of quality group homes into licensed STRTPs and make recommendations regarding adjustments to those timelines.

(f) (1) The extended rate granted pursuant to either paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (d) or subdivision (e) shall be provisional and subject to terms and conditions set by the department during the provisional period.

(2) Consistent with Section 11466.01, for provisional rates, the following shall be established:

(A) Terms and conditions, including the duration of the provisional rate.

(B) An administrative review process for provisional rate
 determinations, including denials, reductions, and terminations.

(C) An administrative review process that includes a departmental review, corrective action, and a protest with the department. Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), this process shall be disseminated by written directive pending the promulgation of regulations.

(g) Upon termination of an existing group home rate under the RCL system, a new rate shall not be paid until an application is approved and a rate is granted by the department pursuant to Section 11462 as a short-term residential therapeutic program or, effective January 1, 2017, the rate set pursuant to Section 11463 as a foster family agency.

(h) The
 department shall, in the development of the new rate structures, consider and provide for placement of all children who are displaced as a result of reclassification of treatment facilities.

(i) Notwithstanding the provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the department may implement this section through all-county letters.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 370, Sec. 276.   (SB 1371)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

11462.041.

(a) The Legislature recognizes that group homes are one of the primary placement options utilized by probation departments to avoid inappropriate housing of youth in a detention hall, more so since the 2007 realignment of most juvenile offenders from state supervision to county supervision. In order to further improve outcomes for these youth, targeted efforts will be required at the state and local levels to create sufficient capacity in home-based family care and in short-term residential therapeutic programs in order to serve these youth safely in the least restrictive, family-based settings, whenever possible. This increased capacity is needed in both the number of related and unrelated family-based caregivers, in the caregivers’ ability to meet the needs of probation youth, and
 in the services and supports available to these caregivers. Additionally, there must be sufficient capacity in short-term residential therapeutic programs to meet the needs of probation youth and ensure public safety.

(b) To meet the capacity needs described in subdivision (a), commencing on January 1, 2016, county probation departments shall do all of the following:

(1) Work with group home providers to develop short-term residential therapeutic programs that meet the treatment needs of probation supervised youth in foster care.

(2) Work with foster family agencies and other community-based organizations to develop strategies to recruit, retain, and support specialized foster homes for probation youth.

(3) Work with the department on strategies to
 identify, engage, and support relative caregivers.

(4) Work with the department to define probation youth outcome measures to be collected and analyzed to assess implementation of this act.

(c) To support the activities described in subdivision (b), commencing on January 1, 2016, the department, in consultation with the Chief Probation Officers of California, shall do all of the following:

(1) Work with providers, courts, and county probation departments to develop capacity for home-based family care.

(2) Work with short-term residential therapeutic programs and foster family agencies to address the treatment needs of specific probation populations, including, but not limited to, sex offenders, youth with gang affiliations, youth who currently are
 placed out of state, and youth with mental illness.

(3) Develop appropriate rate structures to support probation foster youth in home-based family care.

(4) Identify strategies to address the systemic challenges specific to small and rural counties in meeting the needs of probation foster youth in need of placement or treatment services.

(5) Provide technical assistance to existing group home providers interested in serving probation youth during the transition to the short-term residential therapeutic program or foster family agency models outlined in this act.

(6) Provide technical assistance related to implementation of this section to any requesting county probation department.

(d) Beginning January 1, 2018, the department, in consultation with the Chief Probation Officers of California, shall assess the capacity and quality of placement options for probation youth in foster care, including home-based family care and short-term residential therapeutic programs. This assessment shall include:

(1) The number and type of placement options.

(2) Whether short-term residential therapeutic programs have developed programming tailored to address the propensity of probation youth to run away.

(3) The degree to which foster family agencies, community-based service providers, and county probation departments have developed the programs and services necessary to recruit, retain, and support foster families and relative caregivers serving foster youth supervised by probation
 departments.

(4) Any need for additional training and technical assistance to be provided to short-term residential therapeutic programs or foster family agency providers.
